North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 2. Licensure of Facilities for Individuals With Mental Health Disorders, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Disorders.

§ 122C-21.
Purpose.

The purpose of this Article is to provide for licensure of facilities for the individuals with mental health disorders, developmental disabilities, and substance use disorders by the development, establishment, and enforcement of basic rules governing both of the following:

The provision of services to individuals who receive services from licensable facilities as defined by this Chapter.

The construction, maintenance, and operation of these licensable facilities that in the light of existing knowledge will ensure safe and adequate treatment of these individuals. The Department shall ensure that licensable facilities are inspected every two years to determine compliance with physical plant and life-safety requirements.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 4; 2005-276, s. 10.40A(c); 2021-77, s. 7.4(b).

Cross References.

As to penalties for violations of this Article, see

G.S. 122C-24.1

.

Tiered State-County Special Assistance Pilot.

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 12D.2(a)-(e), provides: “(a) As used in this section, the term ‘group home’ means any facility that (i) is licensed under Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, (ii) meets the definition of a supervised living facility under
10A NCAC 27G.5601(c)(1) or
10A NCAC 27G.5601(c)(3), and (iii) serves adults whose primary diagnosis is mental illness or a developmental disability but may also have other diagnoses.

“(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a State-County Special Assistance program that allows counties greater flexibility in serving individual needs within their communities and greater control over how county funds are used to support this program in light of the fact that counties are required to pay for fifty percent (50%) of the costs of this program. To that end, the General Assembly directs the Department of Health and Human Services to establish a pilot program in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

“(c) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Aging and Adult Services (Department), shall establish a pilot program to implement a tiered rate structure within the State-County Special Assistance program for individuals residing in group homes, in-home living arrangements, and assisted living residences as defined in

G.S. 131D-2.1

. The purposes of the pilot program are to (i) determine the best way to implement a block grant for this program statewide and (ii) test the feasibility and effectiveness of implementing a tiered rate structure to address program participants’ intensity of need, including medication management. The Department shall select a minimum of four and a maximum of six counties to participate in the pilot program, at least two of which shall be rural counties and at least two of which shall be urban counties. The pilot program shall (i) be implemented during the 2013-2014 fiscal year, (ii) operate for at least a 12-month period, and (iii) comply with any agreements in effect between the State of North Carolina and the United States government.

“(d) The Department shall implement the pilot program in collaboration with the local departments of social services in the counties selected for participation. As part of the pilot program, the selected counties shall receive a State General Fund allocation as a block grant to be equally matched with county general funds. The General Fund allocation provided to each county participating in the pilot program shall be calculated based upon the average annual Special Assistance expenditures for that county during the 2011-2013 fiscal biennium, adjusted for the amount of projected annual growth in the number of Special Assistance recipients in that county during the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium. These funds may be used to pay for room, board, and personal care services, including medication management, for individuals eligible to receive State-County Special Assistance, subject to the following limitations and requirements:

“(1) These funds shall not be used to cover any portion of the cost of providing services for which an individual receives Medicaid coverage.

“(2) The pilot program shall comply with all federal and State requirements governing the existing State-County Special Assistance program, except that Section 12D.3 does not apply to the pilot program.

“(3) The tiered rate structure shall be based upon intensity of need, and an individual’s placement within a tier shall be based upon an independent assessment of the individual’s need for room, board, and assistance with activities of daily living, including medication management.

“(e) By February 1, 2014, the Department shall submit a progress report on the implementation and operation of the pilot program, including any obstacles to implementation; and by February 1, 2015, the Department shall submit a final report on the results of the pilot program, along with any recommendations based on these results, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. The report due by February 1, 2015, shall include information from all participating counties on at least all of the following:

“(1) The amount of the tiered rates implemented as part of the pilot program.

“(2) The cost methodology for determining these tiered rates.

“(3) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in a group home.

“(4) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in an in-home living arrangement.

“(5) The number of individuals participating in the pilot program while residing in an assisted living residence as defined by

G.S. 131D-2.1

, broken down by facility type.

“(6) A comparison of the number of recipients of State-County Special Assistance prior to and during the pilot program, broken down by county and living arrangement.

“(7) Any other information the Department deems relevant for determining the best way to implement a block grant statewide for the State-County Special Assistance program.”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2013.’ ”

Session Laws
2013-360, s. 38.2, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium.”

§ 122C-22.
Exclusions from licensure; deemed status. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

All of the following are excluded from the provisions of this Article and are not required to obtain licensure under this Article:

Physicians and psychologists engaged in private office practice.

General hospitals licensed under Article 5 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, that operate special units for patients with a mental health disorder diagnosis, one or more developmental disabilities, or a substance use disorder.

State and federally operated facilities.

Adult care homes licensed under Chapter 131D of the General Statutes.

Developmental child care centers licensed under Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes.

Persons subject to licensure under rules of the Social Services Commission.

Persons subject to rules and regulations of the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation Services.

Facilities that provide occasional respite care for not more than two individuals at a time; provided that the primary purpose of the facility is other than as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14).

Twenty-four-hour nonprofit facilities established for the purposes of shelter care and recovery from alcohol or other substance use disorder through a 12-step, self-help, peer role modeling, and self-governance approach.

Inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facilities that provide services exclusively to inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, as described in

G.S. 148-19.1

.

A charitable, nonprofit, faith-based, adult residential treatment facility that does not receive any federal or State funding and is a religious organization exempt from federal income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

A home in which up to three adults, two or more having a disability, co-own or co-rent a home in which the persons with disabilities are receiving three or more hours of day services in the home or up to 24 hours of residential services in the home. The individuals who have disabilities cannot be required to move if the individuals change services, change service providers, or discontinue services.

The Commission may adopt rules establishing a procedure whereby a facility that would otherwise require licensure under this Article that is certified by a nationally recognized agency, such as the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals, may be deemed licensed under this Article by the Secretary. Any facility licensed under the provisions of this subsection shall continue to be subject to inspection by the Secretary. The Secretary shall collaborate with relevant agencies to ensure that any facilities deemed licensed under this Article maintain the required certification.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1110, s. 5; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 13; 1987, c. 345, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 5; 1995, c. 535, s. 7; 1997-506, s. 43; 2000-67, s. 11.25A; 2001-424, s. 25.19(b); 2004-199, s. 32; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2011-202, s. 1; 2012-15, s. 1; 2013-410, s. 11; 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjj); 2021-77, s. 7.3(a).

Cross References.

As to exemption from reporting of death of a client, see

G.S. 122C-31(i)

.

§ 122C-22.
Exclusions from licensure; deemed status. [Effective January 1, 2023]

All of the following are excluded from the provisions of this Article and are not required to obtain licensure under this Article:

Physicians and psychologists engaged in private office practice.

General hospitals licensed under Article 5 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, that operate special units for patients with a mental health disorder diagnosis, one or more developmental disabilities, or a substance use disorder.

State and federally operated facilities.

Adult care homes licensed under Chapter 131D of the General Statutes.

Developmental child care centers licensed under Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes.

Persons subject to licensure under rules of the Social Services Commission.

Persons subject to rules and regulations of the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation Services.

Facilities that provide occasional respite care for not more than two individuals at a time; provided that the primary purpose of the facility is other than as defined in G.S. 122C-3(14).

Twenty-four-hour nonprofit facilities established for the purposes of shelter care and recovery from alcohol or other substance use disorder through a 12-step, self-help, peer role modeling, and self-governance approach.

Inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facilities that provide services exclusively to inmates of the Department of Adult Correction, as described in

G.S. 148-19.1

.

A charitable, nonprofit, faith-based, adult residential treatment facility that does not receive any federal or State funding and is a religious organization exempt from federal income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

A home in which up to three adults, two or more having a disability, co-own or co-rent a home in which the persons with disabilities are receiving three or more hours of day services in the home or up to 24 hours of residential services in the home. The individuals who have disabilities cannot be required to move if the individuals change services, change service providers, or discontinue services.

The Commission may adopt rules establishing a procedure whereby a facility that would otherwise require licensure under this Article that is certified by a nationally recognized agency, such as the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals, may be deemed licensed under this Article by the Secretary. Any facility licensed under the provisions of this subsection shall continue to be subject to inspection by the Secretary. The Secretary shall collaborate with relevant agencies to ensure that any facilities deemed licensed under this Article maintain the required certification.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1110, s. 5; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 695, s. 13; 1987, c. 345, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 5; 1995, c. 535, s. 7; 1997-506, s. 43; 2000-67, s. 11.25A; 2001-424, s. 25.19(b); 2004-199, s. 32; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2011-202, s. 1; 2012-15, s. 1; 2013-410, s. 11; 2017-186, s. 2(jjjjj); 2021-77, s. 7.3(a); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(ooo).

Cross References.

As to exemption from reporting of death of a client, see

G.S. 122C-31(i)

.

§ 122C-23.
Licensure.

No person shall establish, maintain, or operate a licensable facility for individuals with mental illnesses, individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities, or substance abusers without a current license issued by the Secretary.

Each license is issued to the person only for the premises named in the application and is not transferrable or assignable except with prior written approval of the Secretary.

Any person that intends to establish, maintain, or operate a licensable facility shall apply to the Secretary for a license. The Secretary shall prescribe by rule the contents of the application forms.

The Secretary shall issue a license if the Secretary finds that the person complies with this Article and the rules of the Commission and Secretary.

Initial licenses issued under this section are valid for not more than 15 months. Licenses shall be renewed annually thereafter and shall expire at the end of the calendar year. The expiration date of a license shall be specified on the license when issued. Renewal of a regular license is contingent upon receipt of information required by the Secretary for renewal and continued compliance with this Article and the rules of the Commission and the Secretary. Licenses for facilities that have not served any clients during the previous 12 months are not eligible for renewal.The Secretary may issue a provisional license for a period up to six months to a person obtaining the initial license for a facility. The licensee must demonstrate substantial compliance prior to being issued a full license.A provisional license for a period not to exceed six months may be granted by the Secretary to a person that is temporarily unable to comply with a rule when the noncompliance does not present an immediate threat to the health and safety of the individuals in the licensable facility. During this period the licensable facility shall correct the noncompliance based on a plan submitted to and approved by the Secretary. A provisional license for an additional period of time to meet the noncompliance shall not be issued.

(e1)

Except as provided in subsection (e2) of this section, the Secretary shall not (i) enroll as a new provider in the North Carolina Medicaid or North Carolina Health Choice programs, (ii) revalidate as an enrolled provider in the Medicaid or NC Health Choice programs during the period of the license revocation or suspension, or (iii) issue a license for a new facility or a new service to any applicant meeting any of the following criteria:

The applicant was the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility under Chapter 122C, Chapter 131D, or Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes that had its license revoked until 60 months after the date of the revocation.

The applicant is the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility that was assessed a penalty for a Type A or Type B violation under Article 3 of this Chapter, or any combination thereof, and any one of the following conditions exist:

A single violation has been assessed in the six months prior to the application.

Two violations have been assessed in the 18 months prior to the application and 18 months have not passed from the date of the most recent violation.

Three violations have been assessed in the 36 months prior to the application and 36 months have not passed from the date of the most recent violation.

Four or more violations have been assessed in the 60 months prior to application and 60 months have not passed from the date of the most recent violation.

The applicant is the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility that had its license summarily suspended or downgraded to provisional status as a result of violations under G.S. 122C 24.1(a) until 60 months after the date of reinstatement or restoration of the license.

The applicant is the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility that had its license summarily suspended or downgraded to provisional status as a result of violations under Article 1A of Chapter 131D of the General Statutes until 60 months after the date of reinstatement or restoration of the license.

(e2)

The Secretary may enroll a provider described in subsection (e1) of this section if any of the following circumstances apply:

(1)

The applicant is an area program or county program providing services under

G.S. 122C-141

, and there is no other provider of the service in the catchment area.

(2)

The Secretary finds that the area program or county program has shown good cause by clear and convincing evidence why the enrollment should be allowed.

(e3)

Licensure or enrollment shall be denied if an applicant’s history as a provider under Chapter 131D, Chapter 122C, or Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes is such that the Secretary has concluded the applicant will likely be unable to comply with licensing or enrollment statutes, rules, or regulations. In the event the Secretary denies licensure or enrollment under this subsection, the reasons for the denial and appeal rights pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 150B shall be given to the provider in writing.

Upon written application and in accordance with rules of the Commission, the Secretary may for good cause waive any of the rules implementing this Article, so long as those rules do not affect the health, safety, or welfare of the individuals within the licensable facility. Decisions made pursuant to this subsection may be appealed by filing a contested case under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The Secretary may suspend the admission of any new clients to a facility licensed under this Article where the conditions of the facility are detrimental to the health or safety of the clients. This suspension shall be for the period determined by the Secretary and shall remain in effect until the Secretary is satisfied that conditions or circumstances merit removal of the suspension. In suspending admissions under this subsection, the Secretary shall consider the following factors:

The degree of sanctions necessary to ensure compliance with this section and rules adopted to implement this subsection.

The character and degree of impact of the conditions at the facility on the health or safety of its clients.

A facility may contest a suspension of admissions under this subsection in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. In contesting the suspension of admissions, the facility must file a petition for a contested case within 20 days after the Department mails notice of suspension of admissions to the licensee.

The Department shall charge facilities licensed under this Chapter a nonrefundable annual base license fee plus a nonrefundable annual per-bed fee as follows:

Click to view

A social setting detoxification facility or medical detoxification facility subject to licensure under this Chapter shall not deny admission or treatment to an individual based solely on the individual’s inability to pay.

Type of Facility Number of Beds Base Fee Per-Bed Fee Facilities (non-ICF/IID): 0 beds $215.00 $0 1 to 6 beds $305.00 $0 More than 6 beds $475.00 $17.50 ICF/IID Only: 1 to 6 beds $845.00 $0 More than 6 beds $800.00 $17.50

History.

1899, c. 1, s. 60; Rev., s. 4600; C.S., s. 6219; 1945, c. 952, s. 41; 1957, c. 100, ss. 1, 4; 1963, c. 813, s. 1; c. 1166, s. 7; 1965, c. 1178, ss. 1-3; 1969, c. 954; 1973, c. 476, ss. 133, 152; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1983, c. 718, ss. 1, 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, s. 8; 1987, c. 345, ss. 3, 4; 1989, c. 625, s. 6; 2000-55, s. 3; 2002-164, s. 4.1; 2003-284, s. 34.8(a); 2003-294, s. 2; 2003-390, s. 3; 2005-276, ss. 41.2(h), 10.40A(d); 2006-66, s. 10.23; 2009-451, s. 10.76(f); 2021-77, ss. 2, 7.1(b); 2021-88, s. 9(h).

Comprehensive Treatment Services Program.

Session Laws
2007-323, ss. 10.10(a)-(h), (j), (k), provide: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall continue the Comprehensive Treatment Services Program for children at risk for institutionalization or other out-of-home placement. The Program shall be implemented by the Department in consultation with the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [now the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety], the Department of Public Instruction, and other affected State agencies. The purpose of the Program is to provide appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential treatment alternatives for children at risk of institutionalization or other out-of-home placement. Program funds shall be targeted for non-Medicaid eligible children. Program funds may also be used to expand a system-of-care approach for services to children and their families statewide. The program shall include the following:

“(1) Behavioral health screening for all children at risk of institutionalization or other out-of-home placement.

“(2) Appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential services for children within the child mental health deaf and hard of hearing target population.

“(3) Appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential treatment services, including placements for sexually aggressive youth.

“(4) Appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential treatment services, including placements for youth needing substance abuse treatment services and children with serious emotional disturbances.

“(5) Multidisciplinary case management services, as needed.

“(6) A system of utilization review specific to the nature and design of the Program.

“(7) Mechanisms to ensure that children are not placed in department of social services custody for the purpose of obtaining mental health residential treatment services.

“(8) Mechanisms to maximize current State and local funds and to expand use of Medicaid funds to accomplish the intent of this Program.

“(9) Other appropriate components to accomplish the Program’s purpose.

“(10) The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services may enter into contracts with residential service providers.

“(11) A system of identifying and tracking children placed outside of the family unit in group homes, therapeutic foster care home settings, and other out-of-home placements.

“(12) The development of a strong infrastructure of interagency collaboration.

“(13) Individualized strengths-based care.

“(b) In order to ensure that children at risk for institutionalization or other out-of-home placement are appropriately served by the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall do the following with respect to services provided to these children:

“(1) Provide only those treatment services that are medically necessary.

“(2) Implement utilization review of services provided.

“(3) Adopt the following guiding principles for the provision of services:

“a. Service delivery system must be outcome-oriented and evaluation-based.

“b. Services should be delivered as close as possible to the child’s home.

“c. Services selected should be those that are most efficient in terms of cost and effectiveness.

“d. Services should not be provided solely for the convenience of the provider or the client.

“e. Families and consumers should be involved in decision making throughout treatment planning and delivery.

“f. Services shall be specified, delivered, and monitored through a unified Child and Family Plan incorporating the principles of one-child-one-team-one-plan.

“g. Out-of-home placements for children shall be a last resort and shall include concrete plans to bring the children back to a stable, permanent home, their schools, and their community.

“(4) Implement all of the following cost-reduction strategies:

“a. Preauthorization for all services except emergency services.

“b. Levels of care to assist in the development of treatment plans.

“c. Clinically appropriate services.

“(c) The Department shall collaborate with other affected State agencies such as the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Department of Public Instruction, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and with local departments of social services, area mental health programs, and local education agencies to eliminate cost shifting and facilitate cost-sharing among these governmental agencies with respect to the treatment and placement services.

“(d) The Department shall not allocate funds appropriated for Program services until a Memorandum of Agreement has been executed between the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Public Instruction, and other affected State agencies. The Memorandum of Agreement shall address specifically the roles and responsibilities of the various departmental divisions and affected State agencies involved in the administration, financing, care, and placement of children at risk of institutionalization or other out-of-home placement. The Department shall not allocate funds appropriated in this act for the Program until the Memoranda of Agreement between local departments of social services, area mental health programs, local education agencies, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, as appropriate, are executed to effectuate the purpose of the Program. The Memoranda of Agreement shall address issues pertinent to local implementation of the Program, including provision for the immediate availability of student records to a local school administrative unit receiving a child placed in a residential setting outside the child’s home county.

“(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, services under the Comprehensive Treatment Services Program are not an entitlement for non-Medicaid eligible children served by the Program.

“(f) Of the funds appropriated in this act for the Comprehensive Treatment Services Program, the Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a reserve of three percent (3%) to ensure availability of these funds to address specialized needs for children with unique or highly complex problems.

“(g) The Department of Health and Human Services, in conjunction with the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Department of Public Instruction, and other affected agencies, shall report on the following Program information:

“(1) The number and other demographic information of children served.

“(2) The amount and source of funds expended to implement the Program.

“(3) Information regarding the number of children screened, specific placement of children, including the placement of children in programs or facilities outside of the child’s home county, and treatment needs of children served.

“(4) The average length of stay in residential treatment, transition, and return to home.

“(5) The number of children diverted from institutions or other out-of-home placements such as training schools and State psychiatric hospitals and a description of the services provided.

“(6) Recommendations on other areas of the Program that need to be improved.

“(7) Other information relevant to successful implementation of the Program.

“(h) The Department shall report on the following Program funding information:

“(1) The amount of Program funding allocated and expended by each LME.

“(2) The amount of Program funds each LME transferred out of the Program to serve purposes other than those outlined by this Program and an explanation of why LMEs transferred the funding.

“(3) Recommendations to improve the penetration rate of Program funds to serve the intended populations across the State.

“(j) Upon approval of the Legislative Services Commission, the Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and clerical staff to assist in the work of the Task Force. Professional staff shall be those assigned to subject areas or agencies involving child-serving programs administered by the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Department of Public Instruction. Clerical staff shall be furnished to the Task Force through the offices of the House of Representatives and Senate Directors of Legislative Assistants.

“(k) The Department shall report on April 1, 2008, and April 1, 2009, on the implementation of subsections (a) through (h) of this section. The reports required under this subsection shall be made to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.”

For similar provisions, see
2003-294, s. 6(a), and
2005-276, s. 10.25(a)-(g) and (m).

§ 122C-23.1.
Licensure of residential treatment facilities.

The General Assembly finds:

That much of the care for residential treatment facility residents is paid by the State and the counties;

That the cost to the State for care for residents of residential treatment facilities is substantial, and high vacancy rates in residential treatment facilities further increase the cost of care;

That the proliferation of residential treatment facilities results in costly duplication and underuse of facilities and may result in lower quality service;

There is currently no ongoing relationship between some applicants for licensure and local management entities (LMEs) that are responsible for the placement of children and adults in residential treatment facilities; and

That it is necessary to protect the general welfare and lives, health, and property of the people of the State for the local management entity (LME) to verify that additional beds are needed in the LME’s catchment area before new residential treatment facilities are licensed. This process is established to ensure that unnecessary costs to the State do not result, residential treatment facility beds are available where needed, and that individuals who need care in residential treatment facilities may have access to quality care.Based on these findings, the Department of Health and Human Services may license new residential treatment facilities if the applicant for licensure submits with the application a letter of support obtained from the local management entity in whose catchment area the facility will be located. The letter of support shall be submitted to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Service Regulation and Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and shall specify the number of existing beds in the same type of facility in the catchment area and the projected need for additional beds of the same type of facility.

All private psychiatric residential treatment facilities (PRTFs), as defined in

G.S. 122C-450(a)(3)

, that serve children eligible to attend the public schools in accordance with

G.S. 115C-366

, including a student who has been suspended or expelled but otherwise meets the requirements of that statute, shall have a facility-based school as a condition of licensure. Subject to the time limits of subsection (c) of this section, the school shall meet all the requirements of a qualified nonpublic school under Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes and of a Nonpublic Exceptional Children’s Program as defined in

G.S. 122C-450(a)(2)

. The requirements of this subsection and subsection (c) of this section do not apply to PRTFs that are approved charter schools pursuant to Article 14A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

The Department of Health and Human Services may issue an initial license to a PRTF that meets all licensure requirements except for the approval of the facility-based school as a Nonpublic Exceptional Children’s Program by the Department of Public Instruction. This initial license is valid for a period of six months, during which time the PRTF shall obtain approval of its facility-based school as a Nonpublic Exceptional Children’s Program by the Department of Public Instruction. If such approval is not obtained before the expiration of the initial license, the Department of Health and Human Services shall review the PRTF’s license for appropriate action. If the PRTF obtains approval as a Nonpublic Exceptional Children’s Program, the Department of Health and Human Services may issue a license for the remainder of the calendar year, and the facility is eligible for annual renewal thereafter.

At any time upon receipt of a written notice from the Department of Public Instruction that a PRTF has not provided or is not providing educational services, or is not reasonably cooperating with the Department of Public Instruction to ensure those services are provided and that compliance with State and federal law is assured, the Department of Health and Human Services shall review the PRTF’s license for appropriate action. The Department of Health and Human Services may issue sanctions including (i) requiring a refund of all State funds disbursed for the provision of educational services for the current fiscal year, (ii) barring future funding for the provision of educational services for the current or following year, or (iii) suspending or revoking the PRTF’s license.

As used in this section, “residential treatment facility” means a “residential facility” as defined in and licensed under this Chapter, but not subject to Certificate of Need requirements under Article 9 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes.

History.

2005-276, s. 10.40(a); 2007-182, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 8.39(c); 2014-101, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-182, s. 1, effective July 5, 2007, substituted “Division of Health Service Regulation” for “Division of Facility Services” near the middle of the last paragraph.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 8.39(c), effective July 1, 2014, inserted the subsection (a)
designation; added subsections (b) through (d); and redesignated the former last sentence as subsection (e) and substituted “section” for “subsection” therein.

Session Laws 2014-101, s. 7,
substituted “Article 14A of Chapter 115C” for “Part 6A of Article 16 of Chapter 115C” in subsection (b). See Editor’s note for effective date and applicability.

§ 122C-24.
Adverse action on a license.

The Secretary may deny, suspend, amend, or revoke a license in any case in which the Secretary finds that there has been a substantial failure to comply with any provision of this Article or other applicable statutes or any applicable rule adopted pursuant to these statutes. Action[s] under this section and appeals of those actions shall be in accordance with rules of the Commission and Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

When an appeal is filed concerning the denial, suspension, amendment, or revocation of a license, a copy of the proposal for decision shall be sent to the Chairman of the Commission in addition to the parties specified in

G.S. 150B-34

. The Chairman or members of the Commission designated by the Chairman may submit for the Secretary’s consideration written or oral comments concerning the proposal prior to the issuance of a final agency decision in accordance with

G.S. 150B-36

.

History.

1983, c. 718, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 863, ss. 8-10; 1987, c. 345, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to licensure as a supervised living facility for developmentally disabled adults, see the editor’s notes under

G.S. 122C-21

.